Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1818
Plea in bar or abatement; verification by accused required.

No plea in bar or abatement shall be received by the court unless it be in writing, signed by the accused, and sworn to before some competent officer.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 450, p. 823;

R.S.1913, § 9094;

C.S.1922, § 10119;

C.S.1929, § 29-1817;

R.S.1943, § 29-1818.

Plea in bar must be sworn to by accused as prerequisite to validity. Schrum v. State, 108 Neb. 186, 187 N.W. 801 (1922).